nl: Type koffiefilter: Kegelvormig papieren filter; Papierfilter met platte bodem; Permanent metalen of gaasfilter; Herbruikbaar stoffen filter; Overig
vi: Loại bộ lọc cà phê: Giấy lọc hình nón; Giấy lọc đáy phẳng; Bộ lọc kim loại hoặc lưới vĩnh cửu; Bộ lọc vải có thể tái sử dụng; Khác
cs: Typ portafilteru: Kuželový papírový filtr; Papírový filtr s plochým dnem; Trvalý kovový nebo síťový filtr; Opakovaně použitelný látkový filtr; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ kávového filtra: Kužeľový papierový filter; Papierový filter s plochým dnom; Trvalý kovový alebo sieťkový filter; Opakovane použiteľný látkový filter; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta filtra za kavu: Konusni papirnati filtar; Papirnati filtar s ravnim dnom; Trajni metalni ili mrežasti filtar; Višekratni platneni filtar; Ostalo
el: Τύπος φίλτρου καφέ: Χάρτινο φίλτρο κωνικού σχήματος; Χάρτινο φίλτρο με επίπεδη βάση; Μόνιμο μεταλλικό φίλτρο ή φίλτρο πλέγματος; Επαναχρησιμοποιούμενο υφασμάτινο φίλτρο; Άλλο
ru: Тип кофейного фильтра: Конусообразный бумажный фильтр; Бумажный фильтр с плоским дном; Постоянный металлический или сетчатый фильтр; Многоразовый тканевый фильтр; Другой
bg-BG: Тип филтър за кафе: Конусовидни хартиени филтри; Хартиени филтри с плоско дъно; Постоянен метален или мрежест филтър; Платнен филтър за многократна употреба; Друго
fr: Type de filtre à café: Filtre papier conique; Filtre papier fond plat; Filtre permanent en métal ou en maille; Filtre en tissu réutilisable; Autre
lt-LT: Kavos filtro tipas: Kūginis popierinis filtras; Plokščiadugnis popierinis filtras; Nuolatinis metalinis arba tinklelio filtras; Daugkartinio naudojimo audinio filtras; Kita
ro-RO: Tip de filtru de cafea: Filtru de hârtie conic; Filtru de hârtie cu fund plat; Filtru permanent metalic sau plasă; Filtru textil reutilizabil; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta kavnega filtra: Stožčasti Paper filter; Paper filter z ravnim dnom; Trajni kovinski ali mrežasti filter; Filter iz tkanine za večkratno uporabo; Druga
pt-PT: Tipo de filtro de café: Filtro de paper em formato de cone; Filtro de papel de fundo plano; Filtro permanente de metal ou malha; Filtro de tecido reutilizável; Outro
zh-CN: 咖啡滤纸类型: 锥形滤纸; 平底滤纸; 永久性金属/滤纸; 可重复使用的布质滤纸; 其他
es: Tipo de filtro de café: Filtro de papel cónico; Filtro de papel de fondo plano; Filtro permanente de metal o malla; Filtro de tela reutilizable; Otros
ko: 커피 필터 유형: 원뿔형 종이 필터; 사다리꼴 종이 필터; 영구용 금속/메쉬 필터; 재사용 융/광목 필터; 기타
fi: Kahvinsuodattimen tyyppi: Kartiomallinen paperisuodatin; Litteäpohjainen paperisuodatin; Kiinteä metalli- tai verkkosuodatin; Uudelleenkäytettävä kangassuodatin; Muu
hu: Kávéfilter típusa: Kúpos papírszűrő; Lapos aljú papírszűrő; Tartós fém- vagy hálós szűrő; Újrafelhasználható szövetszűrő; Egyéb
zh-TW: 咖啡濾紙類型: 錐形濾紙; 平底濾紙; 永久性金屬或網格濾網; 可重複使用濾布; 其他
th: ประเภทกระดาษกรองกาแฟ: แผ่นกรองกระดาษทรงกรวย; แผ่นกรองกระดาษก้นแบน; แผ่นกรองโลหะหรือตาข่ายแบบถาวร; แผ่นกรองผ้าแบบใช้ซ้ำได้; อื่นๆ
nb: Kaffefiltertype: Paper; Flatbunnet Paper; Permanent metall- eller nettfilter; Gjenbrukbart stofffilter; Annet
en: Coffee filter type: Cone paper filter; Flat-bottom paper filter; Permanent metal or mesh filter; Reusable cloth filter; Other
ja: コーヒーフィルターのタイプ: 円錐形ペーパーフィルター; 平底ペーパーフィルター; 恒久金属またはメッシュフィルター; 再利用可能な布フィルター; その他
de: Kaffeefiltertyp: Kegelförmige Filter aus Papier; Papierfilter mit abgeflachtem Boden; Permanenter Metall- oder Drahtfilter; Wiederverwendbarer Stofffilter; Sonstiges
tr: Kahve filtre tipi: Konik kağıt filtre; Düz tabanlı kağıt filtre; Kalıcı metal veya file filtre; Yeniden kullanılabilir kumaş filtre; Diğer
sv: Typ av kaffefilter: Koniskt filter ; Plattbottnat pappersfilter; Permanent metall- eller nätfilter; Återanvändbart tygfilter; Övrigt
it: Tipo di filtro da caffè: Filtro di carta a cono; Filtro di carta a fondo piatto; Filtro permanente in metallo o a rete; Filtro in tessuto riutilizzabile; Altro
da: Kaffefiltertype: Papirfilter i cone-form; Papirfilter med flad bund; Permanent metal- eller netfilter; Genanvendeligt stoffilter; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de filtro de café: Filtro de papel em formato de cone; Filtro de papel de fundo plano; Filtro permanente de metal ou malha; Filtro de tecido reutilizável; Outro
pl: Typ filtra do kawy: Papierowy filtr stożkowy; Papierowy filtr z płaskim dnem; Stały filtr metalowy / siatkowy; Wielorazowy filtr materiałowy; Pozostałe